Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.900

Purpose—2005 c 274 ss 402-429.

The purpose of sections 402 through 429 of this act is to reorganize the public inspection and copying exemptions in *RCW 42.17.310 through 42.17.31921 by creating smaller, discrete code sections organized by subject matter. The legislature does not intend that this act effectuate any substantive change to any public inspection and copying exemption in the Revised Code of Washington.

[ 2005 c 274 s 401.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The substance of RCW 42.17.310 through 42.17.31921 was recodified in chapter 42.56 RCW. See the Comparative Table in the Table of Disposition of Former RCW Sections.